Hawaii statutes.
§431:10E-103 Exceptions. Section
431:10E-102 does not apply to:

(1) Insurance on buildings and building service
equipment pertaining thereto and part thereof, and machinery, tools, and other
equipment appurtenant to or used in connection with any trade, business,
manufacturing process, governmental operations, or public and private
institutions, and household furniture and furnishings in dwelling houses, with
respect to the difference between the actual value of the insured property at
the time any loss or damage occurs and the cost of repairing, rebuilding, or
replacing with new materials of like size, kind and quality, such property as
has been damaged or destroyed by fire or other peril insured against.

(2) Insurance against the cost of demolition or
reconstruction, or both, of any portion of the insured premises which has not
suffered damage, and the additional cost of repair or reconstruction, or both,
of portions of the insured premises which have suffered damage, necessary to
comply with applicable laws or ordinances. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next